Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 51. General Provisions
§ 5114.
Best interests of the child.

At the time of a permanency review under section 5321 of this title, a modification hearing under section 5113 of this title, or at any time a petition or request to terminate all residual parental rights of a parent without limitation as to adoption is filed by the Commissioner or the attorney for the child, the court shall consider the best interests of the child in accordance with the following:

the interaction and interrelationship of the child with his or her parents, siblings, foster parents, if any, and any other person who may significantly affect the child’s best interests;

the child’s adjustment to his or her home, school, and community;

the likelihood that the parent will be able to resume or assume parental duties within a reasonable period of time;

whether the parent has played and continues to play a constructive role, including personal contact and demonstrated emotional support and affection, in the child’s welfare.

Except in cases where a petition or request to terminate all residual parental rights of a parent without limitation as to adoption is filed by the Commissioner or the attorney for the child, the court shall also consider whether the parent is capable of playing a constructive role, including demonstrating emotional support and affection, in the child’s welfare.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

Particular cases.

In terminating a mother’s parental rights, the trial court properly found that she was unlikely to be able to resume parenting within a reasonable time, as she did not play a significant role in meeting the child’s needs, she still lacked safe and stable housing, and she had not demonstrated an ability to care for the child without supervision. Although she had recently begun to attend visits more consistently and had begun to engage with counseling and parenting classes, she had not sufficiently improved her ability to care for the child during the three years that he had been in agency custody. In re C.L., 2021 VT 66, — Vt. —, 263 A.3d 745, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 88 (Vt. 2021).

In considering whether the mother in a termination of parental rights case was likely to be able to resume parenting within a reasonable time, the trial court was not obligated to draw an inference in favor of the mother based on a psychologist’s vague concerns about the effect of the foster mother’s pregnancy on the foster family’s ability to manage the child and his two siblings in addition to a newborn. In re C.L., 2021 VT 66, — Vt. —, 263 A.3d 745, 2021 Vt. LEXIS 88 (Vt. 2021).

In a termination of parental rights case, the trial court properly found that the parents would not be able to parent the children within a reasonable time, as the evidence, including the parents’ inability to maintain a home free of filth and to learn from parenting coaching, supported the finding of lack of progress and of stagnation. Furthermore, the trial court was not required to expressly consider the opinions of the guardians ad litem in reaching its decision. In re H.T., 2020 VT 3, 211 Vt. 476, 227 A.3d 504, 2020 Vt. LEXIS 4, cert. denied, — U.S. —, 141 S. Ct. 418, 208 L. Ed. 2d 121, 2020 U.S. LEXIS 4397 (2020).

It was error to terminate the parental rights of the child’s biological father. While there was a change of circumstances arising from the identification of the father, who had previously acted as a caretaker for the child, as a legal parent not previously identified or recognized in the approved case plan adopted in the disposition order, the family court based its conclusion that termination was in the child’s best interests on its finding of stagnation, which was inapplicable in the absence of a disposition order that included a case plan that the father had to follow. In re M.P., 2019 VT 69, 211 Vt. 20, 219 A.3d 1315, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 121 (2019).

Trial court properly terminated a mother’s parental rights, as it did not focus on her incarceration per se, but on its impact on her ability to resume parenting within a reasonable time, and it duly weighed the statutory best-interests criteria and determined by clear and convincing evidence that the mother could not resume her parental duties within a reasonable period of time and that whatever bond she had with the child did not overcome other criteria compelling termination of her parental rights. In re N.L., 2019 VT 10, 209 Vt. 450, 207 A.3d 475, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 26 (2019).

In a termination of parental rights proceeding, the Family Division made inadequate findings on the best interests of the child with respect to the father, most particularly regarding whether he would be able to resume his parental duties within a reasonable period of time from the child’s perspective. It did not discuss or evaluate father’s failure to seek contact with the child, notwithstanding the undisputed evidence that he made no effort to contact the Department for Children and Families or seek contact with the child from the time she was taken into State custody in August 2017 until the termination petition was filed in January 2018. In re N.L., 2019 VT 10, 209 Vt. 450, 207 A.3d 475, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 26 (2019).

Statutory best-interests factors compelled termination of a father’s parental rights when the father had never played a constructive role in the child’s life, made no effort to establish visits with her for a critical period of several months after she was taken into State custody, was responsible for the lengthy delay in establishing any contact, and would not be able to resume any parenting role within a reasonable period of time from the child’s perspective, considering her age, the length of time she had spent in State custody, and her need for permanency. In re N.L., 2019 VT 10, 209 Vt. 450, 207 A.3d 475, 2019 Vt. LEXIS 26 (2019).

For purposes of the statutory best-interests analysis in a termination of parental rights case, the record did not support the mother’s contention that she had a significant or constructive relationship with the children, as the mother had not progressed beyond supervised weekly visits, the foster families had been the people who had met the children’s substantial needs, and while the mother had made some progress, she still struggled with her parenting skills. In re N.C. & A.F., 204 Vt. 658, 159 A.3d 1098 (2017).

In a termination of parental rights case, it was appropriate for the family court, irrespective of the fact that the criminal charges against the father were still pending, to consider his pretrial incarceration and its consequences in evaluating what course of action was in the child’s best interests. In re M.W., 2016 VT 28, 201 Vt. 622, 145 A.3d 1250, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 34 (2016).

Family court properly terminated a father’s parental rights when it found that the father was never the child’s primary caregiver; the father was incarcerated and was now unknown to the child; the father had been incarcerated for nearly two years, during which period the child had endured trauma and had since developed a significant bond with his maternal grandparents; the child was a fragile child in dire need of stability and permanence; the length of the father’s pretrial incarceration was uncertain; and even if the father was ultimately not convicted of the multiple crimes with which he had been charged, it would require a significant period of time for him to become part of the child’s life. In re M.W., 2016 VT 28, 201 Vt. 622, 145 A.3d 1250, 2016 Vt. LEXIS 34 (2016).

Trial court did not err in terminating a father’s parental rights. It concluded that it would be impossible for the father to care for the mother, protect the children, meet everyone’s needs, including his own, and support the family, and that the father could not care for the children on his own even if he chose to live apart from the mother; while the trial court recognized that a relative had played some role in the father’s lack of contact with the children, it found the father responsible for the lack of contact as well. In re R.B., 2015 VT 100, 200 Vt. 45, 126 A.3d 496, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 80 (2015).

Trial court did not err in terminating a mother’s parental rights due to the child’s need for permanency while at the same time not terminating the father’s, as it terminated the mother’s rights for multiple reasons, only one of which was the child’s need for permanency, and it found that unlike the mother, the father would most likely be able to resume his parental duties within a reasonable period of time, given his relatively short history of drug use and his demonstrated commitment to overcoming his addiction and caring for his son. Furthermore, speculation over whether the father might move back in with the mother was not a sufficient basis to reverse the Family Division’s termination order with respect to the mother. In re C.F., 2015 VT 45, 198 Vt. 504, 117 A.3d 819, 2015 Vt. LEXIS 21 (2015).

In a termination of parental rights case, the evidence supported the trial court’s critical conclusion that the father would not be able to resume parental responsibilities within a reasonable period of time; the trial court expressly found that in light of the overwhelming evidence of the child’s extreme trauma and the need for trained care providers to provide a safe and stable environment, neither the father nor the child’s paternal grandparents could provide for the child’s highly specialized needs. The father also overlooked the fundamental requirement that a reasonable time had to be measured from the viewpoint of the child’s needs, and the substantial evidence attesting to the child’s critical need for permanence immediately, while he was still relatively young. In re B.C., 2013 VT 58, 194 Vt. 391, 81 A.3d 1152, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 61 (2013).

In a termination of parental rights case, the trial court did not err in finding that the father had not played a significant role in the child’s life. The evidence supported the finding that the father’s role in caring for the child was limited, and the trial court did not give the long suspension of visitation substantial weight in its ruling, which was based fundamentally on the inability of the father or his extended family to understand or address the child’s extensive needs now or in the future, and thus his inability to resume parental responsibilities within a reasonable time. In re B.C., 2013 VT 58, 194 Vt. 391, 81 A.3d 1152, 2013 Vt. LEXIS 61 (2013).

Despite the mother’s progress in meeting her personal goals, termination of her parental rights was in the child’s best interests. The mother had little capacity to adapt her care to the child’s needs, the residence where mother and father reside was not a suitable place for the child, neither parent was capable of living independently of their communal living situation, the child suffered developmental delays while living with his parents, the mother and the child did not share a close bond, and the child would suffer lasting damage if reunification were attempted and unsuccessful. In re C.P., 2012 VT 100, 193 Vt. 29, 71 A.3d 1142, 2012 Vt. LEXIS 98 (2012).

§ 5115.
Protective order.

On motion of a party or on the court’s own motion, the court may make an order restraining or otherwise controlling the conduct of a person if the court finds that such conduct is or may be detrimental or harmful to a child.

The person against whom the order is directed shall be served with notice of the motion and the grounds therefor and be given an opportunity to be heard.

Upon a showing that there is a risk of immediate harm to a child, the court may issue a protective order ex parte. A hearing on the motion shall be held no more than 10 days after the issuance of the order.

The court may review any protective order at a subsequent hearing to determine whether the order should remain in effect.

A person who is the subject of an order issued pursuant to this section and who intentionally violates a provision of the order that concerns contact between the child and that person shall be punished in accordance with

13 V.S.A. § 1030

.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5116.
Costs and expenses for care of child.

The Commissioner may incur such expenses for the proper care, maintenance, and education of a child, including the expenses of medical, surgical, or psychiatric examination or treatment, as the Commissioner considers necessary in connection with proceedings under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters.

The costs of any proceeding under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters incurred under the provisions of this title shall be borne by the court.

The court may, in any order of disposition under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters, make and enforce by levy and execution an order of child support to be paid by the parent of the child.

The court may delegate to the office of magistrate its authority to make and enforce an order of child support to be paid by the parent of a child.

A child support order shall only remain in effect as long as the child who is the subject of the support order is in the legal custody of the Commissioner and placed with someone other than the parent or parents responsible for support.

Except as otherwise provided in section 5119 of this title, orders issued pursuant to this section shall not be confidential.

Notwithstanding subsection 5103(b) of this title, an order terminating a parent’s residual parental rights ends that parent’s obligation to pay child support. However, in no event shall an order terminating residual parental rights terminate an obligation for child support arrearages accrued by the parent prior to the date of the termination of parental rights order.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5117.
Records of juvenile judicial proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided, court and law enforcement reports and files concerning a person subject to the jurisdiction of the court shall be maintained separate from the records and files of other persons. Unless a charge of delinquency is transferred for criminal prosecution under chapter 52 of this title or the court otherwise orders in the interests of the child, such records and files shall not be open to public inspection nor their contents disclosed to the public by any person. However, upon a finding that a child is a delinquent child by reason of commission of a delinquent act that would have been a felony if committed by an adult, the court, upon request of the victim, shall make the child’s name available to the victim of the delinquent act. If the victim is incompetent or deceased, the child’s name shall be released, upon request, to the victim’s guardian or next of kin.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, inspection of such records and files by or dissemination of such records and files to the following is not prohibited:
(b) (1) Notwithstanding the foregoing, inspection of such records and files by or dissemination of such records and files to the following is not prohibited:

a court having the child before it in any juvenile judicial proceeding;

the officers of public institutions or agencies to whom the child is committed as a delinquent child;

a court in which a person is convicted of a criminal offense for the purpose of imposing sentence upon or supervising the person, or by officials of penal institutions and other penal facilities to which the person is committed, or by a parole board in considering the person’s parole or discharge or in exercising supervision over the person;

the parties to the proceeding, court personnel, the State’s Attorney or other prosecutor authorized to prosecute criminal or juvenile cases under State law, the child’s guardian ad litem, the attorneys for the parties, probation officers, and law enforcement officers who are actively participating in criminal or juvenile proceedings involving the child;

the child who is the subject of the proceeding, the child’s parents, guardian, and custodian may inspect such records and files upon approval of the Family Court judge;

any other person who has a need to know may be designated by order of the Family Division of the Superior Court;

the Commissioner of Corrections if the information would be helpful in preparing a presentence report, in determining placement, or in developing a treatment plan for a person convicted of a sex offense that requires registration pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3;

the Human Services Board and the Commissioner’s Registry Review Unit in processes required under chapter 49 of this title; and

the Department for Children and Families.

Files inspected under this subsection shall be marked: UNLAWFUL DISSEMINATION OF THIS INFORMATION IS A CRIME PUNISHABLE BY A FINE UP TO $2,000.00.

Upon motion of a party in a divorce or parentage proceeding related to parental rights and responsibilities for a child or parent-child contact, the court may order that court records in a juvenile proceeding involving the same child or children be released to the parties in the divorce proceeding.
(c) (1) Upon motion of a party in a divorce or parentage proceeding related to parental rights and responsibilities for a child or parent-child contact, the court may order that court records in a juvenile proceeding involving the same child or children be released to the parties in the divorce proceeding.

Upon the court’s own motion in a probate proceeding involving adoption, guardianship, or termination of parental rights, the court may order that court records in a juvenile proceeding involving the same child or children be released to the Probate Division. When the court orders release of records pursuant to this subdivision, the court shall notify the parties that it intends to consider confidential juvenile case information and shall provide the parties with access to the information in a manner that preserves its confidentiality.

Files inspected under this subsection shall be marked: UNLAWFUL DISSEMINATION OF THIS INFORMATION IS A CRIME PUNISHABLE BY A FINE OF UP TO $2,000.00. The public shall not have access to records from a juvenile proceeding that are filed with the court or admitted into evidence in the divorce or parentage proceeding or in the probate proceeding.

Such records and files shall be available to State’s Attorneys and all other law enforcement officers in connection with record checks and other legal purposes.

Any records or reports relating to a matter within the jurisdiction of the court prepared by or released by the court or the Department for Children and Families, any portion of those records or reports, and information relating to the contents of those records or reports shall not be disseminated by the receiving persons or agencies to any persons or agencies, other than those persons or agencies authorized to receive documents pursuant to this section.

This section does not provide access to records sealed in accordance with section 5119 of this title unless otherwise provided in section 5119.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 1

, § 33a;

2009, No. 1

54

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2019, No. 40

, § 4;

2019, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2021, No. 65

, § 17, eff. June 7, 2021.

§ 5118.
Limited exception to confidentiality of records of juveniles maintained by the Family Division of the Superior Court.

As used in this section:

“Delinquent act requiring notice” means conduct resulting in a delinquency adjudication related to a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301(7)

.

“Independent school” means an approved or recognized independent school under

16 V.S.A. § 166

.

While records of juveniles maintained by the Family Division of the Superior Court should be kept confidential, it is the policy of the General Assembly to establish a limited exception for the overriding public purposes of rehabilitating juveniles and protecting students and staff within Vermont’s public and independent schools.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a court finding that a child has committed a delinquent act requiring notice shall, within seven days of such finding, provide written notice to the superintendent of schools for the public school in which the child is enrolled or, in the event the child is enrolled in an independent school, the school’s headmaster.

The written notice shall contain only a description of the delinquent act found by the court to have been committed by the child and shall be marked: “UNLAWFUL DISSEMINATION OF THIS INFORMATION IS A CRIME PUNISHABLE BY A FINE UP TO $2,000.00.” The envelope in which the notice is sent by the court shall be marked: “CONFIDENTIAL: TO BE OPENED BY THE SUPERINTENDENT OR HEADMASTER ONLY.”

The superintendent or headmaster, upon receipt of the notice, shall inform only those persons within the child’s school with a legitimate need to know of the delinquent act, and only after first evaluating rehabilitation and protection measures that do not involve informing staff or students. Persons with a legitimate need to know are strictly limited to only those for whom the information is necessary for the rehabilitation program of the child or for the protection of staff or students. “Need to know” shall be narrowly and strictly interpreted. Persons receiving information from the superintendent or headmaster shall not, under any circumstances, discuss such information with any other person except the child, the child’s parent, guardian, or custodian, others who have been similarly informed by the superintendent or headmaster, law enforcement personnel, or the juvenile’s probation officer.

The superintendent and headmaster annually shall provide training to school staff about the need for confidentiality of such information and the penalties for violation of this section.

The written notice shall be maintained by the superintendent or headmaster in a file separate from the child’s education record. If the child transfers to another public or independent school, the superintendent or headmaster shall forward the written notice in the original marked envelope to the superintendent or headmaster for the school to which the child transferred. If the child either graduates or turns 18 years of age, the superintendent or headmaster then possessing the written notice shall destroy such notice.

If legal custody of the child is transferred to the Commissioner, or if the Commissioner is supervising the child’s probation, upon the request by a superintendent or headmaster, the Commissioner shall provide to the superintendent or headmaster information concerning the child that the Commissioner determines is necessary for the child’s rehabilitation or for the protection of the staff or students in the school in which the child is enrolled.

A person who intentionally violates the confidentiality provisions of this section shall be fined not more than $2,000.00.

Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, no liability shall attach to any person who transmits, or fails to transmit, the written notice required under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238.

§ 5119.
Sealing of records.

In matters relating to a child who has been adjudicated delinquent on or after July 1, 1996, the court shall order the sealing of all files and records related to the proceeding if two years have elapsed since the final discharge of the person unless, on motion of the State’s Attorney, the court finds:
(a) (1) In matters relating to a child who has been adjudicated delinquent on or after July 1, 1996, the court shall order the sealing of all files and records related to the proceeding if two years have elapsed since the final discharge of the person unless, on motion of the State’s Attorney, the court finds:

the person has been convicted of a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301

or adjudicated delinquent of such an offense after such initial adjudication, or a proceeding is pending seeking such conviction or adjudication; or

rehabilitation of the person has not been attained to the satisfaction of the court.

At least 60 days prior to the date upon which a person is eligible to have his or her delinquency record automatically sealed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection, the court shall provide such person’s name and other identifying information to the State’s Attorney in the county in which the person was adjudicated delinquent. The State’s Attorney may object, and a hearing may be held to address the State’s Attorney’s objection.

The order to seal shall include all the files and records relating to the matter in accordance with subsection (d) of this section; however, the court may limit the order to the court files and records only upon good cause shown by the State’s Attorney.

The process of sealing files and records under this subsection for a child who was adjudicated delinquent on or after July 1, 1996, but before July 1, 2001, shall be completed by January 1, 2010. The process of sealing files and records under this subsection for a child who was adjudicated delinquent on or after July 1, 2001 but before July 1, 2004, shall be completed by January 1, 2008.

In matters relating to a child who has been adjudicated delinquent prior to July 1, 1996, on application of the child or on the court’s own motion and after notice to all parties of record and hearing, the court shall order the sealing of all files and records related to the proceeding if it finds:

the person has not been convicted of a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301

or adjudicated delinquent for such an offense after such initial adjudication, and no new proceeding is pending seeking such conviction or adjudication; and

the person’s rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court.

On application of a person who, while a child, was found to be in need of care or supervision or, on the court’s own motion, after notice to all parties of record and hearing, the court may order the sealing of all files and records related to the proceeding if it finds:

the person has reached the age of majority; and

sealing the person’s record is in the interest of justice.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(3) and subsection (h) of this section or otherwise provided, orders issued in accordance with this section shall include the files and records of the court, law enforcement, prosecution, and the Department for Children and Families related to the specific court proceeding that is the subject of the sealing.

Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, upon the entry of an order sealing such files and records under this section, the proceedings in the matter shall be considered never to have occurred, all general index references to the sealed record shall be deleted, and the person, the court, and law enforcement officers and departments shall reply to any request for information that no record exists with respect to such person upon inquiry in any matter. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named in the order.
(e) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, upon the entry of an order sealing such files and records under this section, the proceedings in the matter shall be considered never to have occurred, all general index references to the sealed record shall be deleted, and the person, the court, and law enforcement officers and departments shall reply to any request for information that no record exists with respect to such person upon inquiry in any matter. Copies of the order shall be sent to each agency or official named in the order.

Any court, agency, or department that seals a record pursuant to an order under this section may keep a special index of files and records that have been sealed. This index shall only list the name and date of birth of the subject of the sealed files and records and the docket number of the proceeding that was the subject of the sealing. The special index shall be confidential and may be accessed only for purposes for which a department or agency may request to unseal a file or record pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.
(2) (A) Any court, agency, or department that seals a record pursuant to an order under this section may keep a special index of files and records that have been sealed. This index shall only list the name and date of birth of the subject of the sealed files and records and the docket number of the proceeding that was the subject of the sealing. The special index shall be confidential and may be accessed only for purposes for which a department or agency may request to unseal a file or record pursuant to subsection (f) of this section.

Access to the special index shall be restricted to the following persons:

the commissioner and general counsel of any administrative department;

the secretary and general counsel of any administrative agency;

a sheriff;

a police chief;

a State’s Attorney;

the Attorney General;

the Director of the Vermont Crime Information Center; and

a designated clerical staff person in each office identified in subdivisions (i)-(vii) of this subdivision (B) who is necessary for establishing and maintaining the indices for persons who are permitted access.

Persons authorized to access an index pursuant to subdivision (B) of this subdivision (2) may access only the index of their own department or agency.

Except as provided in subdivisions (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection, inspection of the files and records included in the order may thereafter be permitted by the court only upon petition by the person who is the subject of such records, and only to those persons named in the record.
(f) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this subsection, inspection of the files and records included in the order may thereafter be permitted by the court only upon petition by the person who is the subject of such records, and only to those persons named in the record.

Upon a confidential motion of any department or agency that was required to seal files and records pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the court may permit the department or agency to inspect its own files and records if it finds circumstances in which the department or agency requires access to such files and records to respond to a legal action, a legal claim, or an administrative action filed against the department or agency in relation to incidents or persons that are the subject of such files and records. The files and records shall be unsealed only for the minimum time necessary to address the circumstances enumerated in this subdivision, at which time the records and files shall be resealed.

Upon a confidential motion of the Department for Children and Families, the court may permit the Department to inspect its own files and records if the court finds extraordinary circumstances in which the State’s interest in the protection of a child clearly outweighs the purposes of the juvenile sealing law and the privacy rights of the person or persons who are the subjects of the record, and the sealed record is necessary to accomplish the State’s interest. The motion may be heard ex parte if the court, based upon an affidavit, finds a compelling purpose exists to deny notice to the subject of the files and records when considering whether to grant the order. If the order to unseal is issued ex parte, the court shall send notice of the unsealing to the subject of the files and records within 20 days unless the Department provides a compelling reason why the subject of the files and records should not receive notice. The files and records shall be unsealed only for the minimum time necessary to address the extraordinary circumstances, at which time the files and records shall be resealed.

Upon a confidential motion of a law enforcement officer or prosecuting attorney, the court may permit the department or agency to inspect its own files and records if the court finds extraordinary circumstances in which the State’s interest in public safety clearly outweighs the purposes of the juvenile sealing law and the privacy rights of the person or persons who are the subjects of the record, and the sealed record is necessary to accomplish the State’s interest. The motion may be heard ex parte if the court, based upon an affidavit, finds a compelling public safety purpose exists to deny notice to the subject of the files and records when considering whether to grant the order. If the order to unseal is issued ex parte, the court shall send notice of the unsealing to the subject of the files and records within 20 days unless the law enforcement officer or prosecuting attorney provides a compelling public safety reason why the subject of the files and records should not receive notice. The files and records shall be unsealed only for the minimum time necessary to address the extraordinary circumstances, at which time the files and records shall be resealed.

The order unsealing a record pursuant to subdivisions (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection must state whether the record is unsealed entirely or in part and the duration of the unsealing. If the court’s order unseals only part of the record or unseals the record only as to certain persons, the order must specify the particular records that are unsealed or the particular persons who may have access to the record, or both.

If a person is convicted of a sex offense that requires registration pursuant to 13 V.S.A. chapter 167, subchapter 3, the court in which the person was convicted:

May inspect its own files and records included in the sealing order for the purpose of imposing sentence upon or supervising the person for the registrable offense.

Shall examine court indices developed pursuant to subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section. If the offender appears on any of the court indices, the court shall unseal any court files and records relating to the juvenile adjudication and shall make them available to the Commissioner of Corrections for the purposes of preparing a presentence investigation, determining placement, or developing a treatment plan. The Commissioner shall use only information relating to adjudications relevant to a sex offense conviction.

On application of a person who has pleaded guilty to or has been convicted of the commission of a crime under the laws of this State that the person committed prior to attaining 25 years of age, or on the motion of the court having jurisdiction over such a person, after notice to all parties of record and hearing, the court shall order the sealing of all files and records related to the proceeding if it finds:

two years have elapsed since the final discharge of the person;

the person has not been convicted of a listed crime as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 5301

or adjudicated delinquent for such an offense for 10 years prior to the application or motion, and no new proceeding is pending seeking such conviction or adjudication; and

the person’s rehabilitation has been attained to the satisfaction of the court.

In matters relating to a person who was charged with a criminal offense or was the subject of a delinquency petition on or after July 1, 2006, and prior to the person attaining the age of majority, the files and records of the court applicable to the proceeding shall be sealed immediately if the case is dismissed.
(h) (1) In matters relating to a person who was charged with a criminal offense or was the subject of a delinquency petition on or after July 1, 2006, and prior to the person attaining the age of majority, the files and records of the court applicable to the proceeding shall be sealed immediately if the case is dismissed.

In matters relating to a person who was charged with a criminal offense prior to July 1, 2006, and prior to the person attaining the age of majority, the person may apply to seal the files and records of the court applicable to the proceeding. The court shall order the sealing, provided that two years have elapsed since the dismissal of the charge.

Upon receipt of a court order to seal a record relating to an offense for which there is an identifiable victim, a State’s Attorney shall record the name and date of birth of the victim, the offense, and the date of the offense. The name and any identifying information regarding the defendant shall not be recorded. Victim information retained by a State’s Attorney pursuant to this subsection shall be available only to victims’ advocates, the Victims’ Compensation Program, and the victim and shall otherwise be confidential.

For purposes of this section, to “seal” a file or record means to physically and electronically segregate the record in a manner that ensures confidentiality of the record and limits access only to those persons who are authorized by law or court order to view the record. A “sealed” file or record is retained and shall not be destroyed unless a court issues an order to expunge the record.

The court shall provide assistance to persons who seek to file an application for sealing under this section.

Any entities subject to sealing orders pursuant to this section shall establish policies for implementing this section and shall provide a copy of such policies to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary not later than January 15, 2007. State’s Attorneys, sheriffs, municipal police, and the Judiciary are encouraged to adopt a consistent policy that may apply to each of their independent offices and may submit one policy to the General Assembly.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a criminal record may not be sealed if restitution and surcharges are owed, provided that payment of surcharges shall not be required if the surcharges have been waived by the court pursuant to

13 V.S.A. § 7282

.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2009, No. 1

, § 34;

2011, No. 16

, § 3, eff. May 9, 2011;

2019, No. 40

, § 5;

2019, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. Oct. 7, 2020;

2021, No. 58

, § 3.

§ 5120.
Indian Child Welfare Act.

The federal Indian Child Welfare Act, 25 U.S.C. § 1901 et seq., governs any proceeding under this title that pertains to an Indian child, as defined by the Indian Child Welfare Act, and prevails over any inconsistent provision of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5121.
Case planning process.

The Department shall actively engage families, and solicit and integrate into the case plan the input of the child, the child’s family, relatives, and other persons with a significant relationship to the child. Whenever possible, parents, guardians, and custodians shall participate in the development of the case plan.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5122.
Misconduct during court proceedings.

A person who engages in misconduct while participating in a court proceeding under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters may be subject to appropriate sanctions, including criminal charges, as provided by relevant law, regulation, rule, or employment policy. The confidentiality requirements of subsection 5110(c) of this title shall not apply to the extent necessary to report and respond to allegations of misconduct under the juvenile judicial proceedings chapters. This section shall not be construed to create a private right of action or a waiver of sovereign immunity.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.